02_Morphology/spa.twol
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Á É Í Ó Ú Ü Ñ
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z á é í ó ú ü ñ

%>:0
%{e%}:0
%{e%}:e
z:c
%{o%}:o
%{o%}:a
a:0
o:0
%{c%}:0
%{c%}:c
;

Sets

Con = B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z Ñ
      b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ñ
;

Vow = A E I O U Á É Í Ó Ú Ü
      a e i o u á é í ó ú ü
;

Nongen = E I U Á É Í Ó Ú Ü
         e i u á é í ó ú ü
;


Rules 

"Epenthize [e] between a consonant and a pluralizing [s]"
%{e%}:e <=> Con: %>: _ ;

"Change [z] to [c] when pluralizing"
z:c <=> _ %>: %{e%}:e s ;

"Add the suffix -ita if the word ends with an [o]"
%{o%}:o <=> o: %>: %{c%}: i t _ ;

"Remove [o] at end of the word if adding the suffix -ito"
o:0 <=> _ %>: %{c%}: i t %{o%}:o ;

"Add the suffix -ita if the word ends with an [a]"
%{o%}:a <=> a: %>: %{c%}: i t _ ;

"Remove [a] at the end of the word if adding the suffix -ita"
a:0 <=> _ %>: %{c%}: i t %{o%}:a ;

"Add a [c] if, when adding -ito/-ita, there are two vowels before the end of the word or if there is a non-genedered vowel at the end of the word"
%{c%}:c <=> Vow: Vow: %>: _ i t %{o%}: ; Nongen: %>: _ i t %{o%}: ;

"Fix stress for the word 'dia' for th diminutive suffix"
í:i <=> _ Vow: %>: %{c%}: i t %{o%}: ;

"Add the suffix -illa if the word ends with an [o]"
%{o%}:o <=> o: %>: %{c%}: i l l _ ;

"Remove [o] at end of the word if adding the suffix -illo"
o:0 <=> _ %>: %{c%}: i l l %{o%}:o ;

"Add the suffix -illa if the word ends with an [a]"
%{o%}:a <=> a: %>: %{c%}: i l l _ ;

"Remove [a] at the end of the word if adding the suffix -illa"
a:0 <=> _ %>: %{c%}: i l l %{o%}:a ;

"Add a [c] if, when adding -illo/-illa, there are two vowels before the end of the word or if there is a non-genedered vowel at the end of the word"
%{c%}:c <=> Vow: Vow: %>: _ i l l %{o%}: ; Nongen: %>: _ i l l %{o%}: ;

"Fix stress for the word 'dia' for th diminutive suffix"
í:i <=> _ Vow: %>: %{c%}: i l l %{o%}: ;
